en: cubes, cubed
ca: cub, cubs
es: cubo, cubos
hr: kockice
it: cubi, in cubetti, a cubi
pl: kostka, kostki, w kostkach, w kostce
pt: cubo, cubos, em cubo, em cubos, aos cubos, em cubinhos
ro: cuburi, în cuburi

en: segment, segments
ca: segment, segments
es: segmento, segmenta, segmentos, segmentas

en: diced
bg: на кубчета, кубчета от
ca: a daus, a dauets
de: würfel, gewürfelt, gewürfelte, in würfel geschnitten, in würfel
es: en cubitos, encuadritos, en dados, a dados
fi: kuutioitu, kuutioidut
fr: en dés, en cubes, en julienne, cubes de, dés de, cubes d', dès d'
hu: kockázott, kockázva, kockára vágva, kockára vágott
it: dadi, dado, a dadi, a dadini, in dadi, in dadini
nl: blokjes, in blokjes, blokje
pl: pokrojony w kostkę, pokrojone w kostkę, pokrojona w kostkę, krojony w kostkę, krojone w kostkę, krojona w kostkę
sv: tärnad, tärnat, tärnade

en: minced
it: macinato, macinata, macinate, macinati
ro: tocat, tocate
uk: фарш, фарш з

en: crushed, crushing
bg: натрошенo, натрошен, натрошена, натрошени
es: aplastada, aplastado, aplastadas, aplastados, triturado, triturada, triturados, trituradas
fi: murskattu, murskatut
fr: concassé, concassée, concassés, concassées, broyé, broyée, broyés, broyées, broyage
hr: izdrobljeno, smrvljeno
hu: zúzott, összetörve, összetört
nl: gebroken
pt: triturado, triturada, triturados, trituradas, esmagado, esmagada, esmagados, esmagadas
sv: krossad, krossat, krossade

en: finely crushed
sv: finkrossad, finkrossat, finkrossade

en: pellet, pelleted, agglomerated
fr: aggloméré
hr: aglomerirani, peleta, peletirano

en: rolled
de: gerollt, gerollte, gerollter, gerolltes
es: arrollada, arrollado
it: arrotolata, arrotolato, arrotolati, arrotolate
nl: geplet, geplette
pt: enrolado, enrolada, enrolados, enroladas
sv: valsad, valsat, valsade

en: grated
bg: настърган, настъргано, настъргана, настъргани
ca: ratllat
cs: strouhaný
de: gerieben, geriebener, geriebene, geriebenes, geraspelt, geraspelte, geraspelter, geraspeltes, gerebelt
es: rallada, rallado, ralladas, rallados, rayada, rayado, rayadas, rayados
fi: raastettu, raastetut
fr: râpé, râpée, râpés, râpées, rapé, rapée, rapés, rapées
hr: naribani, ribana, ribani
hu: reszelt, reszelve
it: grattugiato, grattugiata, grattugiati, grattugiate
ja: おろし
lt: tarkuotų, tarkuoti, tarkuotos
nl: geraspt, geraspte
pl: tarty, tarta, tarte
pt: ralado, ralada, ralados, raladas
sv: riven, rivet, rivna
uk: тертий, терта, терте, терті

en: shred, shredded
pt: retalhado, retalhada, retalhados, retalhadas

en: granulated, granules
bg: гранули, на гранули, гранулат
ca: granulat, granulada, granulats
cs: granulát, granulovaný, granulovaná, granulované
da: granulat
de: granulat, granuliert, granulierte, granulierter, granuliertes
es: granulado, granulada, granulados, granuladas
fi: rae
fr: en granules, granules de, granules d', granulaire
hr: u granulama, granulirani
hu: granulátum, granulált
it: granulare, in granuli
ja: 粒状
nl: granulaat
pl: granulat, granulat z, granulowany, granulowana, granulowane
pt: granulado, granulada, granulados, granuladas
sv: granulat, granulerad, granulerat, granulerade
uk: гранульований, гранульована, гранульоване, гранульовані, гранули

en: ground, milled
bg: смляно, смлян, смляна, смляни, мляно
ca: mòlt, mòlts, mòltes
cs: mleté, mletá, mletý
da: formalede, malede
de: gemahlen, gemahlene, gemahlener, gemahlenes
es: molido, molidos, molida, molidas
fi: jauhettu, jauhetut
fr: moulu, moulue, moulus, moulues
hr: mljeveni, mljevena, mljevene, mljevenih
hu: őrölt, őrölve, darált, darálva
is: muldar
lt: malta, maltos, malti
nl: gemalen
pl: mielony, mielone, mielona, mielonego, mielonej, mielonych, zmielony, zmielone, zmielona, zmielonego, zmielonej, zmielonych
pt: moído, moída, moídos, moídas
ru: дробленое
sl: mleti
sv: malen, mald, malet, malt, malna, malda
uk: мелений, мелена, мелене, мелені, дроблений, дроблена, дроблене, дроблені

en: finely ground
cs: jemně mleté, jemně mletá, jemně mletý
de: fein gemahlen, fein gemahlene, fein gemahlener, fein gemahlenes
hr: fino mljeveno
hu: finomra őrölt
pl: drobno mielona, drobno mielone, drobno mielony
sv: finmalen, finmald, finmalet, finmalt, finmalna, finmalda

en: coarsely ground
de: grob gemahlen, grob gemahlene, grob gemahlener, grob gemahlenes
hr: grublje mljeveno, grubo mljeveni
hu: durvára őrölt
sv: grovmalen, grovmald, grovmalet, grovmalt, grovmalna, grovmalda

en: freshly ground
de: frischgemahlen, frischgemahlene, frischgemahlener, frischgemahlenes
hu: frissen őrölt

en: mashed
da: most
hu: pépesített
pl: tłuczone
sv: mosad, mosat, mosade

en: pureed, purée, puréed, puree
xx: puré
be: Пюрэ
bg: пюре, на пюре, пюре от
bn: পিউরি
ca: puré, pure de, pure d'
cs: pyré
da: puré, pure
de: püree, puree, püree aus, puree aus, pürierte
el: πουρές, πουρέ
es: puré, pure, puré de, pure de, cremogenado, cremogenada
et: püree
eu: Pure
fi: sose, pyree, pyre
fo: greytur
fr: en purée, purée de, purée d', purée
fy: brij
hr: kaša, kaša od, pasiran, pasirana, pasirani, pureće, pire, pire od
hu: püré, pürésített
it: purea di
ja: ピュレ, ピューレ, ピューレー
mk: каша од
nb: puré
nl: puree
pl: przecier, przeciery, przecier z, przeciery z, piure z, przetarty, przetarta, przetarte, puree, puree z
pt: puré, em puré, puré de, puré da
sk: pyré
sv: puré, puread, pureat, pureade
uk: пюре

en: concentrated puree
bg: концентрирано пюре, пюре от концентрирано
ca: puré concentrat, puré de concentrat
da: koncentreret puré, puré af koncentreret
de: konzentriertes Püree, Püree aus konzentriertem
es: puré concentrado, puré de concentrado
fi: konsentroitu sose, soseesta konsentroitu
fr: purée concentrée, purée de concentrée
hr: koncentrirana kaša, koncentrirane kaše, kaša od koncentrirane, od koncentrirane kaše, koncentrirana kaša od
hu: koncentrált püré, püré koncentrált
it: purea concentrata, purea di concentrata
ja: 濃縮ピューレ, 濃縮ピューレー
ms: pekat
pl: puree skoncentrowane, puree z skoncentrowane
pt: pure concentrado, pure de concentrado
sv: koncentrerad puré, puré av koncentrerad
uk: концентроване пюре, пюре концентроване

en: whole, and whole
bg: цял, цяло, цяла, цели
ca: sencer, sencera, sencers, senceres
da: hele
de: ganz, ganze, ganzer, ganzes, voll
el: Πλήρες
es: entero, entera, enteros, enteras
et: täis
fi: kokonainen, kokonaiset, täys
fr: entier, entière, entiers, entières, et entier
he: מלא
hr: cijele, cijeli
hu: egész, egészben, teljes
is: ný
it: intero, intera, interi, intere, integrale, integrali
ja: 全, 丸, 丸大
lt: nenugriebto, nenugriebtas
lv: piln
nb: hel
nl: volle
pl: całe, w całości, cała, cały, pelne, pełne
pt: inteiro, inteira, inteiros, inteiras, integral, entero, enteiro, gordo
ro: integral
ru: цельное
sq: gjithë
sv: hel, hela
uk: незбираний, незбирана, незбиране, незбирані

en: whole fat, full cream
bg: пълномаслено
bs: punomasno
cs: plnotučné, plnotučná, plnotučný
fi: rasvainen
hr: punomasno
hu: zsiros
sk: plnotučné
sv: fetthaltig, fetthaltigt, fetthaltiga
zh: 全脂